Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,106.02
Power of court to vacate or modify judgments or orders.

The separate juvenile court and the county court sitting as a juvenile court shall have the power to vacate or modify its own judgments or orders during or after the term at which such judgments or orders were made in the same manner as provided for actions filed in the district court.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 33.

Courts have the power to vacate or modify their own judgments and orders at any time during the term at which they were pronounced. But this power may not be used to circumvent the Legislature's power to fix the time limit to take an appeal. A court may not vacate an order or judgment and reinstate it at a later date just for the purpose of extending the time for appeal. One exception to this rule against using a court's power to vacate as a tool to extend the time for appeal is where a clerk fails to provide notice of a judgment to a party, thereby impairing the party's ability to appeal. In re Interest of Luz P. et al., 295 Neb. 814, 891 N.W.2d 651 (2017).

Juvenile courts have the power to vacate or modify their own judgments and orders during or after the term in which they were made in the same manner as provided for district courts under section 25-2001. In re Interest of Luz P. et al., 295 Neb. 814, 891 N.W.2d 651 (2017).